Utah statutes.
62A-4a-605.   Establishing proof of authority.

A child placing agency is not required to present its license, issued under Chapter 2 of this title, or its certificate of incorporation, or proof of its authority to consent to adoption, as proof of its authority in any proceeding in which it is an interested party, unless the court or a party to the proceeding requests that the agency or its representative establish proof of authority.

